en: Blade design: Fixed; Folding; Razor; Snap-off; Other
ru: Конструкция лезвий: Фиксированный; Складной; Бритва; Отрывной; Другой
sv: Bladutförande: Fast; Hopfällbar; Rakapparat; Snäpp-av; Övrigt
nb: Bladdesign: Fast; Sammenleggbar; Barberhøvel; Avbrekkbar; Annet
sl-SI: Zasnova rezila: Fiksna; Zložljiv; Britvica; Olfa; Drugo
zh-TW: 刀片設計: 固定; 折疊式; 雷射; 摺疊式; 其他
lt-LT: Ašmenų konstrukcija: Fiksuoti; Sulankstomi; Skustuvas; Užspaudžiami; Kita
nl: Ontwerp blad: Vast; Inklapbaar; Scheermes; Afklikbaar; Andere
zh-CN: 刀片设计: 固定; 折叠式的; 剃刀; 美工刀片; 其他
ja: 刃の種類: 固定; 折りたたみ; かみそり; スナップオフ; その他
pl: Konstrukcja ostrza: Stałe; Składanie; Golarka; Odłączane; Inne
th: การออกแบบใบมีด: แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; ขอบพับ; ใบมีด; หักทิ้งได้; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Design lamă: Fixă; Pliabilă; Brici; Segmentată; Altele
es: Diseño de la hoja: Fijo; Plegable; Maquinilla de afeitar; Desprendible; Otros
da: Bladdesign: Fast; Foldbar; Barberblad; Snap-off; Andet
pt-BR: Formato da lâmina: Fixo; Dobrável; Navalha; Removíveis; Outro
pt-PT: Design de lâmina: Fixo; Dobrável; Lâmina; Retrátil; Outro
el: Σχέδιο λεπίδας: Σταθερή; Αναδιπλούμενη; Ξυράφι; Αποσπώμενη; Άλλο
cs: Konstrukce čepele: Pevný; Skládací; Břitva; Odlamovací; Jiné
hr-HR: Dizajn oštrice: Fiksna; Na preklop; Oštrica; Na pričvršćivanje; Ostalo
fr: Conception de la lame: Fixé; Pliant; Rasoir; Cutters; Autre
de: Klingendesign: Befestigt; Faltbar; Rasierer; Snap-off; Sonstiges
tr: Bıçak tasarımı: Sabit; Katlanabilir; Jilet; Koparma; Diğer
it: Design della lama: Fisso; Pieghevole; Rasoio; A sgancio; Altro
bg-BG: Дизайн на острието: Фиксиран; Сгъваем; Бръснач; Макетен; Други
ko: 블레이드 디자인: 고정; 접기; 면도칼; 잘라 쓰는 칼날; 기타
hu: Penge kialakítása: Rögzített; Összecsukható; Borotva; Rápattintható; Egyéb
fi: Terän muotoilu: Pysyvä; Taittuva; Partaveitsi; Irti napsautettava; Muu
sk-SK: Dizajn čepele: Opravený; Skladací; Žiletka; Odlamovací; Iné
vi: Thiết kế lưỡi: Cố định; Xe lăn gấp; Dao cạo; Cứa vào; Khác